Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 4 Classification of Courts-Martial

38-2-1016.
Classification of courts-martial.

There shall be three kinds of courts-martial in the organized militia:

General courts-martial, which shall consist of:

A military judge and not less than six members; or

Only a military judge, if, before the court is assembled, the accused, knowing the identity of the military judge and after consultation with defense counsel, requests orally on the record or in writing a court composed of only a military judge and the military judge approves;

Special courts-martial, which shall consist of:

A military judge and not less than six members; or

Only a military judge, if one has been detailed to the court, and the accused under the same conditions as those provided for in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this Code section so requests; and

Summary courts-martial, consisting of one commissioned officer.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1016

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 816

.

38-2-1017.
Jurisdiction of courts-martial; generally.

Each force of the organized militia has court-martial jurisdiction over all members of the particular force of the organized militia who are subject to this article. The Georgia Army National Guard and the Georgia Air National Guard shall have court-martial jurisdiction over all members subject to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1017

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 816

.

38-2-1018.
General courts-martial.

Subject to Code Section 38-2-1017, general courts-martial shall have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this article for any offense made punishable by this article, and shall, under such limitations as the Governor may prescribe pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter, adjudge any one or more of the following punishments not otherwise forbidden by this article:

Confinement for a period of not more than ten years;

Restriction to specified limits for not more than six months;

Dismissal, dishonorable discharge, or bad conduct discharge;

Forfeiture of all or a portion of pay and allowances;

Restitution;

Reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade of enlisted persons;

A reprimand; and

No punishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1018

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

Cross references.

Vesting of efficiency and medical examining boards with powers of courts of inquiry and courts-martial, §

38-2-216

.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 818

.

38-2-1019.
Special courts-martial.

Subject to Code Section 38-2-1017, special courts-martial shall have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this article for any offense made punishable by this article, and shall, under such limitations as the Governor, or the adjutant general by delegation of the Governor, may prescribe by regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter, adjudge any one or more of the following punishments not otherwise forbidden by this article:

Confinement for a period of not more than one year;

Restriction to specified limits for not more than six months;

Bad conduct discharge;

Forfeiture of all or a portion of pay and allowances for not more than one year;

Restitution;

Reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade of enlisted persons;

A reprimand; and

No punishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1019

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 819

.

38-2-1020.
Summary courts-martial.

Subject to Code Section 38-2-1017, summary courts-martial shall have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this article, except for commissioned or warrant officers, cadets, candidates, and midshipmen, for any offense made punishable by this article under such limitations as the Governor, or the adjutant general by delegation of the Governor, may prescribe by regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter.

No person with respect to whom summary courts-martial shall have jurisdiction may be brought to trial before a summary court-martial if he or she objects thereto. If objection to trial by summary court-martial is made by an accused, trial by special or general court-martial shall be ordered, as may be appropriate. Summary courts-martial shall, under such limitations as the Governor, or the adjutant general by delegation of the Governor, may prescribe by regulations issued pursuant to Part 1 of Article 2 of this chapter, adjudge any one or more of the following punishments not otherwise forbidden by this article:

Confinement for a period of not more than one month;

Restriction to specified limits for not more than two months;

Forfeiture of all or a portion of pay and allowances for not more than 60 days;

Restitution;

Reduction of no more than two grades of enlisted persons;

A reprimand; and

No punishment.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1020

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 820

.

38-2-1021.
Reserved.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1021

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.